Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.181

Loss of sole remaining manager.

In the event of the death, resignation, or removal of the sole remaining manager, or if one of the events described in RCW 25.15.131(1) (e) through (h) occurs with regard to the sole remaining manager, the limited liability company shall become member-managed unless one or more managers are appointed by a majority of the members within ninety days after the occurrence of such an event.

[ 2015 c 188 s 38.]